src/scripts/Kyrgyz/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2016  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define Number (%+|%-) [%0|[NZDigit Digit^<12]] (%%) ; 

define NamesOfPowersOfTen миң|миллион|миллиард;

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> миң || Digit _ Digit^3 (%%) .#.;

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> миллион || Digit _ Digit^3 миң;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> миллиард || Digit _ Digit^3 миллион;

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0 %0 %0 NamesOfPowersOfTen -> 0 ; 

define Units %0:0|1:бир|2:эки|3:үч|4:төрт|5:беш|6:алты|7:жети|8:сегиз|9:тогуз;

define Tens %0:0|1:он|2:жыйырма|3:отуз|4:кырк|5:элүү|6:алтымыш|7:жетимиш|8:сексен|9:токсон;

define Hundreds [%0:0] .P. [[[1:0] .P. Units] 0:жүз];

define UpToThousand %0:нөл .P. [((Hundreds) Tens) Units];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToThousand @-> ,, 
%+ @-> плүс ,, 
%- @-> минус ,, 
%% @-> пайыз ; 

regex 
Number .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
DigitsToWords ; 
